Maryland, session 2025, HB1201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
23–206.2.
(a) (1) A motor vehicle for which special registration plates have been issued
under § 13–616 of this article is exempt from the mandatory inspections required by this
subtitle if:
(i) All of the owners of the motor vehicle meet the disability
requirements of § 13–616(b)(1) of this article;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1201*

HOUSE BILL 1201
(ii) The motor vehicle is driven [5,000] 10,000 miles or less
annually; and
(iii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify the following:
(i) That the owner of the motor vehicle meets the disability
requirements of § 13–616(b)(1) of this article;
(ii) That the motor vehicle has been issued a special disabled
person’s registration number and special registration plates under § 13–616 of this article;
(iii) That the motor vehicle is driven [5,000] 10,000 miles or less
annually; and
(iv) The motor vehicle’s odometer reading at the time of the
certification.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(b) (1) A motor vehicle owned by an individual who is at least 70 years of age
at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle is exempt from the
mandatory inspections required by this subtitle if:
(i) All of the owners of the motor vehicle are at least 70 years of age
at the time of the scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle;
(ii) The motor vehicle is being driven [5,000] 10,000 miles or less
annually; and
(iii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify the following:
(i) That all of the owners of the motor vehicle are at least 70 years
of age at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle;
(ii) That the motor vehicle is being driven [5,000] 10,000 miles or
less annually; and
(iii) The motor vehicle’s odometer reading at the time of the
certification.

HOUSE BILL 1201 3
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.